apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--

    Generated semi-automatically from the Norsk ordbank.
    http://www.edd.uio.no/prosjekt/ordbanken/

    Grep for "todo" if you're looking for work.

    Some of the stuff in this file that is still very much work-in-progress
    or barely begun:

    - Spelling choice pardefs, see eg. <pardef n="høyr_LR_hør">

    - Multiword / separable verb experiments with "rå til" and "høyre til",
      see http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Norsk#Multiword_expressions.2C_particle_verbs

    - Compounding. Most noun pardefs refer to the pardefs "cp-R" and "cp-both-s",
      although many of these noun pardefs have non-compounding alternatives, named
      _no-cp__n instead of just __n. This needs lt-proc-j to work.


    Licence: GPL only

  -->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÆØÅabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzæøåcqwxzCQWXZéèêóòâôÉÊÈÓÔÒÂáàÁÀäÄöÖ</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/> 
		<sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/> 
		<sdef n="top"   c="Toponym"/>
		<sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="res" 	c="Reciprocal pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/> 
		<sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/> 
		<sdef n="p1" 	c="1st person"/> 
		<sdef n="p2" 	c="2nd person"/> 
		<sdef n="p3" 	c="3rd person"/> 
		<sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/> 
		<sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine, also utrum in nouns"/> 
		<sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/> 
		<sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/> 
		<sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/> 
		<sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/> 
		<sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/> 
		<sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/> 
		<sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/> 
		<sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/> 
		<sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/> <!-- the oblique case -->
		<sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/> 
		<sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/> 
		<sdef n="itg" 	c="Question word / interrogative"/>
 		<sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/>
                <sdef n="neg" 	c="Negative"/> 
		<sdef n="emph" 	c="Emphatic"/>
		<sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/> 
		<sdef n="pass" 	c="-st form"/>
		<sdef n="pstv" 	c="-st verb"/>
		<sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/> 
		<sdef n="pres" 	c="Present"/> 
		<sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/> 
		<sdef n="pret" 	c="Preterite"/> 
		<sdef n="pp" 	c="Perfect participle (vblex/adj)"/> 
		<sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle (adjectival)"/>
		<sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/> 
		<sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/>
                <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/>
		<sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/> 
		<sdef n="part" 	c="Participle (infinitive mark, also particles)"/> 
		<sdef n="sep" 	c="Seperable verb/particle"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="posi" 	c="Positive"/>
		<sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/> 
		<sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/> 
		<sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral"/> 
		<sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/>
		<sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/> 
		<sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence end"/> 
		<sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/>
		<sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/>
		<sdef n="clb" 	c="Possible clause boundary"/> 
		<sdef n="overskrift" 	c="Headline"/> 
		<sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/> 
		<sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/> 

		<sdef n="compound-only-L" 	c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/> 
		<sdef n="compound-R" 	c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/> 
		<sdef n="ep-Ø" 	c="no epenthesis"/>
		<sdef n="ep-s" 	c="s-epenthesis"/> 
		<sdef n="ep-e" 	c="e-epenthesis"/> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>

          <!-- Compounding pardefs. -->
<pardef n="cp-R"> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l>uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuu</l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
 </pardef>
 <pardef n="cp-R_S__case"> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l>uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuu</l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuus</l>          <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 </pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both-s">
   <e r="LR"><p><l>uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuu</l>          <r><s n="ep-Ø"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l>uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuus</l>         <r><s n="ep-s"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l>uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuu</l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both-s_S__case">
   <e r="LR"><p><l>uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuu</l>          <r><s n="ep-Ø"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l>uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuus</l>         <r><s n="ep-s"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l>uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuu</l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuus</l>          <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Genitive case endings mostly only for proper nouns -->
<pardef n="S__case">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="'s__case">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="'__case">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- Radical vs conservative spelling choices -->
<pardef n="no_LR_nå">
  <e>                    <p><l>no</l><r>no</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>nå</l><r>no</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="køyr_LR_kjør">
  <e>                    <p><l>køyr</l><r>køyr</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>kjør</l><r>køyr</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="køyrsle_LR_kjørsels">
  <!-- also in k/øyrsle__n -->
  <e>                    <p><l>køyrsle</l><r>køyrsle</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>kjørsels</l><r>køyrsle</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>kjørsle</l><r>køyrsle</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="høyr_LR_hør">
  <e>                    <p><l>høyr</l><r>høyr</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>hør</l> <r>høyr</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="høyrsle_LR_hørsels">
  <!-- s-epenthesis -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>høyrsels</l><r>høyrsle</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>hørsels</l><r>høyrsle</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>hørsle</l><r>hørsle</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>høyrsle</l><r>høyrsle</r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Punctuation -->
<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <!-- separate out the number 1 as singular (fortunately "1.00" is usually plural!) -->
  <e>       <re>1</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[02-9]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9][.,][0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <p><l>..</l><r>..<s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>...</l><r>...<s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aposchar">
  <e>       <i>'</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <par n="aposchar"/><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- <pardef n="overskrift"> -->
<!--   <e>       <re> -->

<!-- </re><p><l></l><r><s n="clb"/><s n="overskrift"/></r></p></e> -->
<!-- </pardef> -->

<e lm="enno">            <i>en</i><par n="no_LR_nå"/><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="no">              <par n="no_LR_nå"/><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="no og då">        <par n="no_LR_nå"/><i><b/>og<b/>då</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="no til dags">     <par n="no_LR_nå"/><i><b/>til<b/>dags</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="bortkøyre">       <i>bort</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kappkøyre">	 <i>kapp</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="privatkøyre">	 <i>privat</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="prøvekøyre">	 <i>prøve</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="samkøyre">	 <i>sam</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skumkøyre">	 <i>skum</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sprengkøyre">	 <i>spreng</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lærekøyre">	 <i>lære</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="innkøyre">           <i>inn</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="avhøyre">	 <i>av</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bønhøyre">	 <i>bøn</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bønnhøyre">	 <i>bønn</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forhøyre">	 <i>for</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kryssforhøyre">	 <i>kryssfor</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="mishøyre">	 <i>mis</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="overhøyre">    <i>over</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yt/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilhøyre">        <i>til</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="høyre">		 <i></i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="yr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="påkøyrslefri">   <i>på</i><par n="køyrsle_LR_kjørsels"/><i>fri</i><par n="ny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="påkøyringsfri">         <i>på</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><i>ingsfri</i><par n="ny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avkøyrslefri">   <i>av</i><par n="køyrsle_LR_kjørsels"/><i>fri</i><par n="ny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ubønnhøyrleg">     <i>ubønn</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="sak/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nolevande"> <par n="no_LR_nå"/><i>levande</i><par n="OK__adj"/></e>
<e lm="notidig">        <par n="no_LR_nå"/><i>tidig</i><par n="svart__adj"/></e>
<e lm="no">              <par n="no_LR_nå"/><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avhøyr"><i>av</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="ty__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avkøyringsrampe"><i>av</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><i>ingsramp</i><par n="od/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forhøyrsrett"><i>for</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><i>srett</i><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="høyrsleinntrykk"><par n="høyrsle_LR_hørsels"/><i>inntrykk</i><par n="ty__n"/></e>
    <e lm="høyrslenerve"><par n="høyrsle_LR_hørsels"/><i>nerv</i><par n="r/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="høyrsleskade"><par n="høyrsle_LR_hørsels"/><i>skad</i><par n="r/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="høyrslevern"><par n="høyrsle_LR_hørsels"/><i>vern</i><par n="ty__n"/></e>
    <e lm="køyrefelt"><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><i>efelt</i><par n="ty__n"/></e>
    <e lm="køyretur"><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><i>etur</i><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kryssforhør"><i>kryssfor</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="ty__n"/></e>
    <e lm="omkøyringsveg"><i>om</i><par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><i>ingsveg</i><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tredjegradsforhøyr"><i>tredjegradsfor</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="ty__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vitneforhøyr"><i>vitnefor</i><par n="høyr_LR_hør"/><par n="ty__n"/></e>
<e lm="køyreskulebil">   <par n="køyr_LR_kjør"/><i>eskulebil</i><par n="ep__n"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
   <e>                      <par n="overskrift"/></e>
